Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-179.03
Electronic inspection, defined.

Electronic inspection means a method of performing inspections of livestock enrolled with the Nebraska Brand Committee utilizing approved nonvisual identifier means of identification.

Laws 2021, LB572, § 6.
August 28, 2021